Utah statutes.
58-80a-302.   Certification is voluntary.

(1)  The certification provided under this chapter is voluntary.

(2)  This chapter does not prohibit a person from acting as a medical language interpreter, if the person does not have a certificate described in Subsection 58-80a-301(1).



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 127, 2010 General Session

